Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2373
Local hospital district; depositories; bond requirements; payment of deposits.

For the security of the funds deposited under the provisions of sections 77-2369 to 77-2385, the secretary-treasurer shall require all such depositories to give bonds for the safekeeping and payment of such deposits and the accretions thereof, except as otherwise provided in section 77-2385 for time deposits. The bond shall run to the people of the local hospital district, be approved by the board of directors, and be conditioned that the depository shall, at the end of each and every month, render to the secretary-treasurer and the board of directors a statement in duplicate showing the several daily balances and the amounts of money of the local hospital district held by it during the month and how credited. For the payment of the deposits, the depository shall render such deposits when demanded by the secretary-treasurer on his or her check at any time, perform whatever else is required by sections 77-2369 to 77-2385, and faithfully discharge the trust reposed in such depository.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 5.